California statutes. Labor Code
(c) For purposes of determining whether to grant or deny a workers’ compensation claim, if an employee is injured or killed by a third party in the course of the employee’s employment, no personal relationship or personal connection shall be deemed to exist between the employee and the third party based only on a determination that the third party injured or killed the employee solely because of the third party’s personal beliefs relating to his or her perception of the employee’s race, religious creed, color, national origin, age, disability, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 719, Sec. 29.   (AB 887)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3600.1.

(a) Whenever any firefighter of the state, as defined in Section 19886 of the Government Code, is injured, dies, or is disabled from performing his or her duties as a firefighter by reason of his or her proceeding to or engaging in a fire-suppression or rescue operation, or the protection or preservation of life or property, anywhere in this state, including the jurisdiction in which he or she is employed, but is not at the time acting under the immediate direction of his or her employer, he or she or his or her dependents, as the case may be, shall be accorded by his or her employer all of the same benefits of this division that he, she, or they would have received had that firefighter been acting under the immediate direction of his or her employer. Any injury, disability, or death incurred under the circumstances described in this section shall be deemed to have arisen out of, and been sustained in, the course of employment for purposes of workers’ compensation and all other benefits.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to do either of the following:

(1) Require the extension of any benefits to a firefighter who, at the time of his or her injury, death, or disability, is acting for compensation from one other than the state.

(2) Require the extension of any benefits to a firefighter employed by the state where by departmental regulation, whether now in force or hereafter enacted or promulgated, the activity giving rise to the injury, disability, or death is expressly prohibited.

(c) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 143.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3600.2.

(a) Whenever any peace officer, as defined in Section 50920 of the Government Code, is injured, dies, or is disabled from performing his or her duties as a peace officer by reason of engaging in the apprehension or attempted apprehension of law violators or suspected law violators, or protection or preservation of life or property, or the preservation of the peace, anywhere in this state, including the local jurisdiction in which he or she is employed, but is not at the time acting under the immediate direction of his or her employer, the peace officer or his or her dependents, as the case may be, shall be accorded by the peace officer’s employer all of the same benefits, including the benefits of this
 division, that the peace officer or his or her dependents would have received had that peace officer been acting under the immediate direction of his or her employer. Any injury, disability, or death incurred under the circumstances described in this section shall be deemed to have arisen out of and been sustained in the course of employment for purposes of workers’ compensation and all other benefits.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to:

(1) Require the extension of any benefits to a peace officer who at the time of his or her injury, death, or disability is acting for compensation from one other than the city, county, city and county, judicial district, or town of his or her primary employment.

(2) Require the
 extension of any benefits to a peace officer employed by a city, county, city and county, judicial district, or town which by charter, ordinance, or departmental regulation, whether now in force or hereafter enacted or promulgated, expressly prohibits the activity giving rise to the injury, disability, or death.

(3) Enlarge or extend the authority of any peace officer to make an arrest; provided, however, that illegality of the arrest shall not affect the extension of benefits by reason of this act if the peace officer reasonably believed that the arrest was not illegal.

(4) Preclude an employer, at its discretion or in
 accordance with written policies adopted by resolution of the employer’s governing body, from accepting liability for compensation under this division for an injury sustained by a peace officer, as defined in Section 50920 of the Government Code, by reason of engaging in the apprehension or attempted apprehension of law violators or suspected law violators, or protection or preservation of life or property, or the preservation of the peace, outside the state of California, but who was not at the time acting under the immediate direction of his or her employer, including any claims for injuries sustained by peace officers during the October 1, 2017, mass shooting
 in Las Vegas, Nevada, if the employer determines that providing compensation serves the public purposes of the employer. For claims filed pursuant to this paragraph by peace officers for injuries sustained during the October 1, 2017, mass shooting in Las Vegas, Nevada, the date of injury for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 5405 shall be deemed the operative date of the act adding this paragraph. Acceptance of liability under this subdivision shall not affect the determination of whether or not the peace officer acted within the scope of his or her employment for any other purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 1749)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3600.3.

(a) For the purposes of Section 3600, an off-duty peace officer, as defined in subdivision (b), who is performing, within the jurisdiction of his or her employing agency, a service he or she would, in the course of his or her employment, have been required to perform if he or she were on duty, is performing a service growing out of and incidental to his or her employment and is acting within the course of his or her employment if, as a condition of his or her employment, he or she is required to be on call within the jurisdiction during off-duty hours.

(b) As used in subdivision (a), “peace officer” means those employees of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection named as peace officers for purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 830.37 of the Penal Code.

(c) This section does not apply to any off-duty peace officer while he or she is engaged, either as an employee or as an independent contractor, in any capacity other than as a peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 122.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3600.4.

(a) Whenever any firefighter of a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision, or any firefighter employed by a private entity, is injured, dies, or is disabled from performing his or her duties as a firefighter by reason of his or her proceeding to or engaging in a fire suppression or rescue operation, or the protection or preservation of life or property, anywhere in this state, including the local jurisdiction in which he or she is employed, but is not at the time acting under the immediate direction of his or her employer, he or she or his or her dependents, as the case may be, shall be accorded by his or her employer all of the same benefits of this division which he or she or they would have received had that firefighter been acting under the immediate direction of his or her employer. Any injury, disability, or death incurred under the circumstances described in this section shall be deemed to have arisen out of and been sustained in the course of employment for purposes of workers’ compensation and all other benefits.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to:

(1) Require the extension of any benefits to a firefighter who at the time of his or her injury, death, or disability is acting for compensation from one other than the city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision, or private entity, of his or her primary employment or enrollment.

(2) Require the extension of any benefits to a firefighter employed by a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision, or private entity, which by charter, ordinance, departmental regulation, or private employer policy, whether now in force or hereafter enacted or promulgated, expressly prohibits the activity giving rise to the injury, disability, or death. However, this paragraph shall not apply to relieve the employer from liability for benefits for any injury, disability, or death of a firefighter when the firefighter is acting pursuant to Section 1799.107 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 617, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

3600.5.

(a) If an employee who has been hired or is regularly working in the state receives personal injury by accident arising out of and in the course of employment outside of this state, he or she, or his or her dependents, in the case of his or her death, shall be entitled to compensation according to the law of this state.

(b) (1) An employee who has been hired outside of this state and his or her employer shall be exempted from the provisions of this division while the employee is temporarily within this state doing work for his or her employer if the employer has furnished workers’ compensation insurance coverage under the workers’
 compensation insurance or similar laws of a state other than California, so as to cover the employee’s work while in this state if both of the following apply:

(A) The extraterritorial provisions of this division are recognized in the other state.

(B) The employers and employees who are covered in this state are likewise exempted from the application of the workers’ compensation insurance or similar laws of the other state.

(2) In any case in which paragraph (1) is satisfied, the benefits under the workers’ compensation insurance or similar laws of the other state, and other remedies under those laws, shall be the exclusive remedy against the employer for any injury, whether resulting in death or not,
 received by the employee while working for the employer in this state.

(c) (1) With respect to an occupational disease or cumulative injury, a professional athlete who has been hired outside of this state and his or her employer shall be exempted from the provisions of this division while the professional athlete is temporarily within this state doing work for his or her employer if both of the following are satisfied:

(A) The employer has furnished workers’ compensation insurance coverage or its equivalent under the laws of a state other than California.

(B) The employer’s workers’ compensation insurance or its equivalent covers the professional athlete’s work while in this state.

(2) In any case in which paragraph (1) is satisfied, the benefits under the workers’ compensation insurance or similar laws of the other state, and other remedies under those laws, shall be the exclusive remedy against the employer for any occupational disease or cumulative injury, whether resulting in death or not, received by the employee while working for the employer in this state.

(3) A professional athlete shall be deemed, for purposes of this subdivision, to be temporarily within this state doing work for his or her employer if, during the 365 consecutive days immediately preceding the professional athlete’s last day of work for the employer within the state, the professional athlete performs less than 20 percent of his or her duty days in California during that 365-day period
 in California.

(d) (1) With respect to an occupational disease or cumulative injury, a professional athlete and his or her employer shall be exempt from this division when all of the professional athlete’s employers in his or her last year of work as a professional athlete are exempt from this division pursuant to subdivision (c) or any other law, unless both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The professional athlete has, over the course of his or her professional athletic career, worked for two or more seasons for a California-based team or teams, or the professional athlete has, over the course of his or her professional athletic career, worked 20 percent or more of his or her duty days either in California or for a California-based team. The
 percentage of a professional athletic career worked either within California or for a California-based team shall be determined solely by taking the number of duty days the professional athlete worked for a California-based team or teams, plus the number of duty days the professional athlete worked as a professional athlete in California for any team other than a California-based team, and dividing that number by the total number of duty days the professional athlete was employed anywhere as a professional athlete.

(B) The professional athlete has, over the course of his or her professional athletic career, worked for fewer than seven seasons for any team or teams other than a California-based team or teams as defined in this section.

(2) When subparagraphs (A) and (B) of
 paragraph (1) are both satisfied, liability for the professional athlete’s occupational disease or cumulative injury shall be determined in accordance with Section 5500.5.

(e) An employer of professional athletes, other than a California-based team, shall be exempt from Article 4 (commencing with Section 3550) of Chapter 2, and subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 5401.

(f) For purposes of this section, a certificate from the duly authorized officer of the appeals board or similar department of another state certifying that the employer of the other state is insured in that state and has provided extraterritorial coverage insuring his or her employees while working within this state shall be prima facie evidence that the employer carries workers’ compensation
 insurance.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) The term “professional athlete” means an athlete who is employed at either a minor or major league level in the sport of baseball, basketball, football, ice hockey, or soccer.

(2) The term “California-based team” means a team that plays a majority of its home games in California.

(3) The term “duty day” means a day
 in which any services are performed by a professional athlete under the direction and control of his or her employer pursuant to a player contract.

(4) The term “season” means the period from the date of the first preseason team activity for that contract year, through the date of the last game the professional athlete’s team played during the same contract year.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision apply to all claims for benefits pursuant to this division filed on or after September 15,
 2013. The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall not constitute good cause to reopen any final decision, order, or award.

(i) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 653, Sec. 1.   (AB 1309)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3600.6.

Disaster service workers registered by a disaster council while performing services under the general direction of the disaster council shall be entitled to all of the same benefits of this division as any other injured employee, except as provided by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4351) of Part 1. For purposes of this section, an unregistered person impressed into performing service as a disaster service worker during a state of war emergency, a state of emergency, or a local emergency by a person having authority to command the aid of citizens in the execution of his or her duties shall also be deemed a disaster service worker and shall be entitled to the same benefits of this division as any other disaster service worker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 554, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3600.8.

(a) No employee who voluntarily participates in an alternative commute program that is sponsored or mandated by a governmental entity shall be considered to be acting within the course of his or her employment while utilizing that program to travel to or from his or her place of employment, unless he or she is paid a regular wage or salary in compensation for those periods of travel. An employee who is injured while acting outside the course of his or her employment, or his or her dependents in the event of the employee’s death, shall not be barred from bringing an action at law for damages against his or her employer as a result of this section.

(b) Any alternative commute program provided, sponsored, or subsidized by an employee’s employer in order to comply with any trip reduction mandates of an air quality management district or local government shall be considered a program mandated by a governmental entity. An employer’s reimbursement of employee expenses or subsidization of costs related to an alternative commute program shall not be considered payment of a wage or salary in compensation for the period of travel. If an employer’s salary is not based on the hours the employee works, payment of his or her salary shall not be considered to be in compensation for the period of travel unless there is a specific written agreement between the employer and the employee to that effect. If an employer elects to provide workers’ compensation coverage for those employees who are passengers in a vehicle owned and operated by the employer or an agent thereof, those employees shall be considered to be within the course of their employment, provided the employer notifies employees in writing prior to participation of the employee or coverage becoming effective.

(c) As used in this section, “governmental entity” means a regional air district, air quality management district, congestion management agency, or other local jurisdiction having authority to enact air pollution or congestion management controls or impose them upon entities within its jurisdiction.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, vanpool programs may continue to provide workers’ compensation benefits to employees who participate in an alternative commute program by riding in a vanpool, in the case in which the vanpool vehicle is owned or registered to the employer.

(e) Employees of the state who participate in an alternative commute program, while riding in a vanpool vehicle that is registered to or owned by the state, shall be deemed to be within the course and scope of employment for workers’ compensation purposes only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3601.

(a) Where the conditions of compensation set forth in Section 3600 concur, the right to recover such compensation, pursuant to the provisions of this division is, except as specifically provided in this section, the exclusive remedy for injury or death of an employee against any other employee of the employer acting within the scope of his or her employment, except that an employee, or his or her dependents in the event of his or her death, shall, in addition to the right to compensation against the employer, have a right to bring an action at law for damages against the other employee, as if this division did not apply, in either of the following cases:

(1) When the injury or death is proximately caused by the willful and unprovoked physical act of aggression of the other employee.

(2) When the injury or death is proximately caused by the intoxication of the other employee.

(b) In no event, either by legal action or by agreement whether entered into by the other employee or on his or her behalf, shall the employer be held liable, directly or indirectly, for damages awarded against, or for a liability incurred by the other employee under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) No employee shall be held liable, directly or indirectly, to his or her employer, for injury or death of a coemployee except where the injured employee or his or her dependents obtain a recovery under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 922, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

3602.

(a) Where the conditions of compensation set forth in Section 3600 concur, the right to recover compensation is, except as specifically provided in this section and Sections 3706 and 4558, the sole and exclusive remedy of the employee or his or her dependents against the employer. The fact that either the employee or the employer also occupied another or dual capacity prior to, or at the time of, the employee’s industrial injury shall not permit the employee or his or her dependents to bring an action at law for damages against the employer.

(b) An employee, or his or her dependents in the event of his or her death, may bring an action at law for damages
 against the employer, as if this division did not apply, in the following instances:

(1) Where the employee’s injury or death is proximately caused by a willful physical assault by the employer.

(2) Where the employee’s injury is aggravated by the employer’s fraudulent concealment of the existence of the injury and its connection with the employment, in which case the employer’s liability shall be limited to those damages proximately caused by the aggravation. The burden of proof respecting apportionment of damages between the injury and any subsequent aggravation thereof is upon the employer.

(3) Where the employee’s injury or death is proximately caused by a defective product manufactured by the employer and
 sold, leased, or otherwise transferred for valuable consideration to an independent third person, and that product is thereafter provided for the employee’s use by a third person.

(c) In all cases where the conditions of compensation set forth in Section 3600 do not concur, the liability of the employer shall be the same as if this division had not been enacted.

(d) (1) For the purposes of this division, including Sections 3700 and 3706, an employer may secure the payment of compensation on employees provided to it by agreement by another employer by entering into a valid and enforceable agreement with that other employer under which the other employer agrees to obtain, and has, in fact, obtained workers’ compensation coverage for those employees. In
 those cases, both employers shall be considered to have secured the payment of compensation within the meaning of this section and Sections 3700 and 3706 if there is a valid and enforceable agreement between the employers to obtain that coverage, and that coverage, as specified in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 3700, has been in fact obtained, and the coverage remains in effect for the duration of the employment providing legally sufficient coverage to the employee or employees who form the subject matter of the coverage. That agreement shall not be made for the purpose of avoiding an employer’s appropriate experience rating as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 11730 of the Insurance Code.

(2) Employers who have complied with this subdivision shall not be subject to civil, criminal, or other penalties for failure to provide workers’
 compensation coverage or tort liability in the event of employee injury, but may, in the absence of compliance, be subject to all three.

(e) As provided in paragraph (12) of subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4 of the Penal Code, in cases where an employer is convicted of a crime against an employee, a payment to the employee or the employee’s dependent that is paid by the employer’s workers’ compensation insurance carrier shall not be used to offset the amount of the restitution order unless the court finds that the defendant substantially met the obligation to pay premiums for that insurance coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 868, Sec. 1.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3603.

Payment of compensation in accordance with the order and direction of the appeals board shall discharge the employer from all claims therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

3604.

It is not a defense to the State, any county, city, district or institution thereof, or any public or quasi-public corporation, that a person injured while rendering service for it was not lawfully employed by reason of the violation of any civil service or other law or regulation respecting the hiring of employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3605.

The compensation due an injured minor may be paid to him until his parent or guardian gives the employer or the latter’s compensation insurance carrier written notice that he claims such compensation.

Compensation paid to such injured minor prior to receipt of such written notice is in full release of the employer and insurance carrier for the amount so paid. The minor can not disaffirm such payment upon appointment of a guardian or coming of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Compensation Insurance and Security [3700. - 3823.]



  ARTICLE 1. Insurance and Security [3700. - 3709.5.]

3700.

Every employer except the state shall secure the payment of compensation in one or more of the following ways:

(a) By being insured against liability to pay compensation by one or more insurers duly authorized to write compensation insurance in this state.

(b) By securing from the Director of Industrial Relations a certificate of consent to self-insure either as an individual employer, or as one employer in a group of employers, which may be given upon furnishing proof satisfactory to the Director of Industrial Relations of ability to self-insure and to pay any compensation that may become due to his or her employees.

(c) For any county, city, city and county, municipal corporation, public district, public agency, or any political subdivision of the state, including each member of a pooling arrangement under a joint exercise of powers agreement (but not the state itself), by securing from the Director of Industrial Relations a certificate of consent to self-insure against workers’ compensation claims, which certificate may be given upon furnishing proof satisfactory to the director of ability to administer workers’ compensation claims properly, and to pay workers’ compensation claims that may become due to its employees. On or before March 31, 1979, a political subdivision of the state which, on December 31, 1978, was uninsured for its liability to pay compensation, shall file a properly completed and executed application for a certificate of consent to self-insure against workers’ compensation claims. The certificate shall be issued and be subject to the provisions of Section 3702.

For purposes of this section, “state” shall include the superior courts of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 905, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3700.1.

As used in this article:

(a) “Director” means the Director of Industrial Relations.

(b) “Private self-insurer” means a private employer which has secured the payment of compensation pursuant to Section 3701.

(c) “Trustees” means the Board of Trustees of the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund.

(d) “Member” means a private self-insurer which participates in the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund.

(e) “Incurred liabilities for the payment of compensation” means the sum of an estimate of future
 compensation, as compensation is defined by Section 3207, plus an estimate of the amount necessary to provide for the administration of claims, including legal costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 10.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3700.5.

(a) The failure to secure the payment of compensation as required by this article by one who knew, or because of his or her knowledge or experience should be reasonably expected to have known, of the obligation to secure the payment of compensation, is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for up to one year, or by a fine of up to double the amount of premium, as determined by the court, that would otherwise have been due to secure the payment of compensation during the time compensation was not secured, but not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(b) A second or subsequent conviction shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed one year, by a fine of triple the amount of premium, or by both that imprisonment and fine, as determined by the court, that would otherwise have been due to secure the payment of compensation during the time payment was not secured, but not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(c) Upon a first conviction of a person under this section, the person may be charged the costs of investigation at the discretion of the court. Upon a subsequent conviction, the person shall be charged the costs of investigation in addition to any other penalties pursuant to subdivision (b). The costs of investigation shall be paid only after the payment of any benefits that may be owed to injured workers, any reimbursement that may be owed to the director for benefits provided to the injured worker pursuant to Section 3717, and any other penalty assessments that may be owed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 3.   Effective March 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3701.

(a) Each year every private self-insuring employer shall secure incurred liabilities for the payment of compensation and the performance of the obligations of employers imposed under this chapter by renewing the prior year’s security deposit or by making a new deposit of security. If a new deposit is made, it shall be posted within 60 days of the filing of the self-insured employer’s annual report with the director, but in no event later than May 1.

(b) The solvency risk and security deposit amount for each private and group self-insurer shall be acceptable to the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund.

(c) Unless otherwise permitted by regulation, the deposit shall be an
 amount equal to the self-insurer’s projected losses, net of specific excess insurance coverage, if any, and inclusive of incurred but not reported (IBNR) liabilities, allocated loss adjustment expense, and unallocated loss adjustment expense, calculated as of December 31 of each year. The calculation of projected losses and expenses shall be reflected in a written actuarial report that projects ultimate liabilities of the private self-insured employer at the expected actuarial confidence level, to ensure that all claims and associated costs are recognized. The written actuarial report shall be prepared by an actuary meeting the qualifications prescribed by the director in regulation.

(d) In determining the amount of the deposit required to secure incurred
 liabilities for the payment of compensation and the performance of obligations of a self-insured employer imposed under this chapter, the director shall offset estimated future liabilities for the same claims covered by a self-insured plan under the federal Longshore and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 901 et seq.), but in no event shall the offset exceed the estimated future liabilities for the claims under this chapter.

(e) The director may only accept as security, and the employer shall deposit as security, cash, securities, surety bonds, or irrevocable letters of credit in any combination the director, in his or her discretion, deems adequate security. The current deposit shall include any amounts covered by terminated surety bonds or excess insurance policies, as shall be set forth in regulations adopted by the director pursuant to Section 3702.10.

(f) Surety
 bonds, irrevocable letters of credit, and documents showing issuance of any irrevocable letter of credit shall be deposited with, and be in a form approved by, the director, shall be exonerated only according to its terms and, in no event, by the posting of additional security.

(g) The director may accept as security a joint security deposit that secures an employer’s obligation under this chapter and that also secures that employer’s obligations under the federal Longshore and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act.

(h) The liability of the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund, with respect to any claims brought under both this chapter and under the federal Longshore and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act, to pay for shortfalls in a security deposit shall be limited to the amount of claim liability owing the employee under this chapter offset by the amount of any claim liability owing under the
 federal Longshore and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act, but in no event shall the liability of the fund exceed the claim liability under this chapter. The employee shall be entitled to pursue recovery under either or both the state and federal programs.

(i) Securities shall be deposited on behalf of the director by the self-insured employer with the Treasurer. Securities shall be accepted by the Treasurer for deposit and shall be withdrawn only upon written order of the director.

(j) Cash shall be deposited in a financial institution approved by the director, and in the account assigned to the director. Cash shall be withdrawn only upon written order of the director.

(k) Upon the sending by the director of a request to renew, request to post, or request to increase or decrease a security deposit, a perfected security
 interest is created in the private self-insured’s assets in favor of the director and the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund to the extent of any then unsecured portion of the self-insured’s incurred liabilities. That perfected security interest is transferred to any cash or securities thereafter posted by the private self-insured with the director and is released only upon either of the following:

(1) The acceptance by the director of a surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit for the full amount of the incurred liabilities for the payment of compensation.

(2) The return of cash or securities by the director.

The private self-insured employer loses all right, title, and interest in, and any right to control, all assets or obligations posted or left on deposit as security. The director may liquidate the deposit as provided in Section 3701.5
 and apply it to the self-insured employer’s incurred liabilities either directly or through the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 11.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3701.3.

The director shall return to a private self-insured employer all individual security determined, with the consent of the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund, to be in excess of that needed to ensure the administration of the employer’s self insuring, including legal fees, and the payment of any future claims. This section shall not apply to any security posted as part of the composite deposit, or to any security turned over to the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund following an order of default under Section 3701.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 12.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3701.5.

(a) If the director determines that a private self-insured employer has failed to pay workers’ compensation as required by this division, the security deposit shall be utilized to administer and pay the employer’s compensation obligations.

(b) If the director determines the security deposit has not been immediately made available for the payment of compensation, the director shall determine the method of payment and claims administration as appropriate, which may include, but is not limited to, payment by a surety that issued the bond, or payment by an issuer of an irrevocable letter of credit, and administration by a surety or by an adjusting agency, or through the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund, or any combination thereof.
 If the director arranges for administration and payment by any person other than the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund after a default is declared, the fund shall have no responsibility for claims administration or payment of the claims.

(c) If the director determines the payment of benefits and claims administration shall be made through the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund, the fund shall commence payment of the private self-insured employer’s obligations for which it is liable under Section 3743 within 30 days of notification. Payments shall be made to claimants whose entitlement to benefits can be ascertained by the fund, with or without proceedings before the appeals board. Upon the assumption of obligations by the fund pursuant to the director’s determination, the fund shall have a right to immediate possession of any posted security and the custodian, surety, or issuer of any irrevocable letter of credit shall turn over the security to the fund
 together with the interest that has accrued since the date of the self-insured employer’s default or insolvency.

(d) The payment of benefits by the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund from security deposit proceeds shall release and discharge any custodian of the security deposit, surety, any issuer of a letter of credit, and the self-insured employer, from liability to fulfill obligations to provide those same benefits as compensation, but does not release any person from any liability to the fund for full reimbursement. Payment by a surety constitutes a full release of the surety’s liability under the bond to the extent of that payment, and entitles the surety to full reimbursement by the principal or his or her estate. Full reimbursement includes necessary attorney fees and other costs and expenses, without prior claim or proceedings on the part of the injured employee or other beneficiaries. Any decision or determination made, or any settlement
 approved, by the director or by the appeals board under subdivision (f) shall conclusively be presumed valid and binding as to any and all known claims arising out of the underlying dispute, unless an appeal is made within the time limit specified in Section 5950.
